District of Columbia statutes.
1-602.06

Supersession provisions; effectiveness of collective bargaining on compensation matters.

On the date that the provisions of § 1-617.16 become operational and negotiations commence concerning compensation matters, all employees of the District government in the appropriate bargaining units under § 1-617.16, including those described in § 1-602.04, shall be subject to the procedures and provisions for establishing compensation provided in § 1-617.16: Provided, however, that no employee subject to the provisions of § 1-602.04 shall be reduced in actual pay, except in accordance with the provisions of subchapter XXIV of this chapter.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 206, 25 DCR 5740

Cross References

Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
Organization for personnel management, rules and regulations, see § 1-604.04.
Rent stabilization program, rent administrator, qualifications and compensation, see § 42-3502.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-617.17.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-602.6.
1973 Ed., § 1-332.6.